Illinois, session 104th, HB2422.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Insurance Code is amended by 5adding Article XLVIII as follows: 6    (215 ILCS 5/Art. XLVIII heading new)7ARTICLE XLVIII. OWNER-CONTROLLED INSURANCE PROGRAM 8    (215 ILCS 5/1800 new)9    Sec. 1800. Findings. The General Assembly finds the 10following: 11    (1) Small contractors, including many small businesses, 12minority-owned businesses, women-owned businesses, and 13businesses owned by persons with disabilities often struggle 14to find competitive insurance options that meet the standards 15required for public construction projects, and these 16businesses particularly struggle to obtain insurance options 17that are affordable. High insurance premiums make these 18businesses less competitive as prime contractors and 19subcontractors because the contractors and subcontractors pass 20along increased costs to public owners in the form of higher 21bid prices.22    (2) Under an Owner-Controlled Insurance Program, a single   HB2422- 2 -LRB104 10139 BAB 20211 b1policy held by the owner covers the owner and contractors of 2all levels for the entire construction project or group of 3projects, which reduces barriers by allowing contractors that 4historically struggle to obtain insurance at an affordable and 5competitive price to not only bid but be awarded the contract.6    (3) In a conventional project structure, in which many 7contractors provide insurance to the public owner, disputes 8between different carriers over liability and coverage consume 9considerable time and resources, escalating costs. In 10contrast, an Owner-Controlled Insurance Program can provide 11more efficient coverage through a single policy. Further, when 12a public owner implements an Owner-Controlled Insurance 13Program, the owner is relieved of the burden of monitoring 14that each contractor maintains coverage if the project 15continues beyond the length of an applicable policy.16    (4) Owners, in this case, the State of Illinois, can 17attain economies of scale when using an Owner-Controlled 18Insurance Program versus a traditional insurance approach.19    (5) Owner-Controlled Insurance Programs also create safe 20worksites. In contrast to a conventional project structure 21wherein contractors and subcontractors hold multiple policies 22with separate safety requirements, Owner-Controlled Insurance 23Programs typically harmonize safety standards across 24contractors. Additionally, Owner-Controlled Insurance 25Programs can allow for an integrated data platform to 26facilitate safety data collection and review.  HB2422- 3 -LRB104 10139 BAB 20211 b1    (6) It is in the interest of the State of Illinois to 2ensure efficient and uniform insurance coverage required 3throughout the duration of construction agencies projects.4    (7) It is in the interest of the State of Illinois to use 5economies of scale to be good stewards of taxpayer dollars.6    (8) It is necessary to reduce barriers of entry to assist 7in the development of new and emerging construction 8contractors.9    (9) It is in the best interest of the State of Illinois to 10promote safe worksites  11    (215 ILCS 5/1805 new)12    Sec. 1805. Definitions. In this Article:13    "Construction" means building, altering, repairing, 14improving, or demolishing any public structure or building, or 15making improvements of any kind to public real property. 16"Construction" does not include the routine operation, routine 17repair, or routine maintenance of existing structures, 18buildings, or real property.19    "Construction agency" means the Capital Development Board 20for construction or remodeling of State-owned facilities; the 21Illinois Department of Transportation for construction or 22maintenance of roads, highways, bridges, and airports; the 23Illinois Toll Highway Authority for construction or 24maintenance of toll highways; Central Management Services; 25public institutions of higher education as defined in   HB2422- 4 -LRB104 10139 BAB 20211 b1subsection (f) of Section 1-13 of the Illinois Procurement 2Code; and any other State agency entering into construction 3contracts as authorized by law or by delegation from the chief 4procurement officer.5    "Construction contractor" means any person having a 6contract, as defined in Section 1-15.30 of the Illinois 7Procurement Code, with a State agency.8    "Department" means the Department of Insurance.9    "Owner-Controlled Insurance Program" means a single 10insurance policy that the State or any municipality may use 11for construction projects that covers the owner and 12contractors of all levels for the entire project or group of 13projects.  14    (215 ILCS 5/1810 new)15    Sec. 1810. Owner-Controlled Insurance Program.16    (a) The Department is authorized to enter into a contract 17with a private insurance broker to establish an 18Owner-Controlled Insurance Program. The Owner-Controlled 19Insurance Program shall provide the following forms of 20insurance, if applicable, to construction contractors for the 21purpose of satisfying requirements to contract with a 22construction agency:23        (1) general and excess liability;24        (2) professional liability;25        (3) builders' risk;  HB2422- 5 -LRB104 10139 BAB 20211 b1        (4) contractors' pollution liability;2        (5) workers' compensation; and3        (6) cyber liability.4    (b) The Department shall comply with all applicable 5provisions of the Illinois Procurement Code when procuring a 6contract for the provision of an Owner-Controlled Insurance 7Program.8    (c) A contract between the Department and an insurance 9broker for the provision of an Owner-Controlled Insurance 10Program shall not exceed 5 years in duration.  11    (215 ILCS 5/1815 new)12    Sec. 1815. Eligibility. All tiers of construction 13contractors shall be eligible to obtain any form of insurance 14required to contract with a construction agency, as authorized 15in Section 1810, for the purposes of satisfying the insurance 16obligations necessary to execute a construction contract for a 17construction agency. 18    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 19becoming law.